Mississippi, session 2026, HB710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be reimbursed from the General Fund for any lost revenue resulting from the issuance of statutory discounts related to the sale of hunting and fishing licenses, admission into state parks, golf courses, campgrounds and recreational trails, fishing permits, boat rentals, cabin rentals and cottage and camping reservations in an amount equal to the statutory discounts issued.  This section shall apply only to those statutory discounts issued on or after July 1, 2026. (2)  The department shall maintain an accounting of such lost revenue as described in subsection (1) of this section, and shall submit the accounting to the Department of Finance and Administration for the payment of monies from the State General Fund in an amount equal to such lost revenue, on or before June 30 of each fiscal year. (3)  Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of such accounting from the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Department of Finance and Administration shall transfer the total amount of such lost revenue for the fiscal year into the Fisheries and Wildlife Fund as provided for in Section 49-5-21. (4)  The accounting maintained under subsection (2) of this section, and any other records relating to the accounting, shall be subject to audit by the State Auditor. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.